hyph-idn.tex
u2g5r
ugu6t
u4h
uhu2
4ui
u5ism
uju4
4uju.
4ujul
uju6m
4ujut
uka7m
uk4b
uki2
3ukir
uk4la
uko5p
uko7s
uk5s4
uku4
4ukuh
uku6m
4ukus
u2laj
u5lat
ule6
ule2k
u3l4i
3ulid.
uli8s
u4l5iz
4ult
4u5lu4
u4m
umba2
4umbah
umba4k
umbu4
4umpar
umpe4
4umpu
4umuh
3umu6m
umu6t
4una
unafi4ka
unag6
una4i5
u4nan
4unc
4undai
4undin
undu4
u5ne
ung4a
u3ngal
u3ngam
u3ngas
ungga4
unggu5k
5unggun.
ung4i5
ungka7s
4ungku
u7ng6u6
4unia
un5iah
4unjung
unti4k
4untit
4untum
4untus
4upak
3upa8m
u4pan
4upas
3upay
upe4
4upi
upi4n
u4p3l
u4p5r
up7ram
u5p6ran
upu4
u3r
uradu4
4urasa
4urb
urd3
ur4di
urea3
ureal4
uri5p
ur6o
uro4n
4urs
urta4
u5ru4
u6r3u5l
5urungk
4usa.
use2l
use6r
useu6
u7si
u8sifk
usi6m
us5k
uso5
4usr
uste6
usu4
4usutk
4usy
u4ta
u5tab
5utam
4uti
uti4kan
uti6p
4uto
u4t5r
u6trad
utua5
utual4
6utui
6utu4k
utu2l
utu4r3ism
u3u
u5w
uwu4
u5y
uyo4
uyu4
4uyup
3v
ve4ra
vete7
v3g
vib5
4v3l
vori4
3w
waa5
wa3g6
wa5id
wai5t
wa2l3af
wale3
wa4n
wa5ngi
wa5p6
wa5s6r
was5w
wa3u
5w4e
wedu4
we8sa
we4t
wi5k
5wi4n
wi5ng
win3i
wi5r
wiri4
wo4k
wo3la
wo4t
4w3r
4ws
4wt
5wu3
wu4r
yabo6
yag6
ya3i
ya4ik
yai5t
ya7ma2
yama4k
yami4
ya4na
ya4pa5
yapu5
ya7sa
ya3u4k
ya3ul
ya3up
yebe7
yenda6
yeranta5
y3g
ygu2
yile4
yiste6
y4o
yo2la
yo4na
y3r
yri4ka
yua7s
yubli6
yu6ma
yusu5k
3z
zali6
za4ta
4zb
4zh
zion3
zio4nism
zi5p
4zk
z3l
4zm
zo5ha
zo3i
zos5p
zu5h
zu2l
4z3y
